Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
DISCONTINUANCE - CITIES AND TOWNS

31-3-101. Petition to the district court.

Proceedings to discontinue the incorporation of any city or town may be commenced by the filing of a petition to discontinue such incorporation, signed by twenty-five percent of the registered electors of the city or town, with the district court of the county wherein such city or town, or any part thereof, is situate. Upon satisfying itself that the petition meets the requirements of this section, the court shall cause a notice to be published once each week for at least four weeks, which notice shall state that the question of discontinuing the incorporation of such city or town shall be submitted to a vote of the registered electors thereof at its next regular election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 326, § 78, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-9-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-3-102. Form of ballots.

The form of ballots shall be "For the incorporation" and "Against the incorporation".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-9-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-3-103. Return - canvass - costs.

The vote for this purpose shall be taken, canvassed, and returned in the same manner as in other municipal elections. All expenses of the same shall be paid by the city or town when the result of the vote is "Against the incorporation" but by the petitioners when the result is "For incorporation".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-9-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For municipal elections, see article 10 of this title.

31-3-104. Discontinuance - when effective - legal indebtedness - tax.

If two-thirds of the total votes cast upon such question are cast "Against incorporation", the incorporation of the city or town shall be discontinued; except that no such discontinuance shall be effective until such time as the governing body of the city or town has made proper provisions for the payment of all of its indebtedness and for the faithful performance of all its contractual and other obligations, levied the requisite taxes, and appropriated the requisite funds therefor and until two certified copies of notice of such action with a legal description accompanied by a map of the area concerned are filed by the city or town with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such action has taken place. The county clerk and recorder shall file the second certified copy of such notice with the division of local government of the department of local affairs as provided by section 24-32-109, C.R.S. For the payment of its indebtedness, the city or town shall issue warrants in cases where there is no money in the treasury. The county treasurer shall collect the tax which is levied to pay such indebtedness as he collects other taxes and shall pay the warrants. Any surplus of this fund shall be transmitted to the school fund of the district where the same is levied.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-9-103 and 31-9-107 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-3-105. Books deposited - court records.

The books, documents, records, papers, and corporate seal of any city or town so discontinued shall be deposited with the county clerk and recorder of the county with which the petition was filed, for safekeeping and reference in the future.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1022, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-9-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-3-106. County clerk and recorder to publish - posting.

When the incorporation of any city or town has been discontinued in accordance with the provisions of this part 1, the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the city or town, or any part thereof, was situate shall publish notice of such discontinuance of incorporation once each week for at least four weeks in some newspaper published within the county, or, if no newspaper is published within the county, said county clerk and recorder shall post notice thereof in three public places within the county for a period of not less than thirty calendar days. Said county clerk and recorder shall also certify the fact of discontinuance of incorporation to the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1022, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-9-106 as it existed prior to 1975.